Hawaii statutes.
§431:10D-104
Standard nonforfeiture law for life insurance. (a) This section shall be
known as the Standard Nonforfeiture Law for Life Insurance.

(b) With regard to
nonforfeiture benefits of life insurance:

(1) In the case of policies issued on or after the
operative date of this section as defined in subsection (i), no policy of life
insurance, except as stated in subsection (h), shall be delivered or issued for
delivery in this State unless it contains in substance the following
provisions, or corresponding provisions that in the opinion of the commissioner
are at least as favorable to the defaulting or surrendering policyholder as are
the minimum requirements hereinafter specified and are essentially in
compliance with subsection (g):

(A) That, in the event of default in any
premium payment, the company shall grant, upon proper request not later than
sixty days after the due date of the premium in default, a paid-up
nonforfeiture benefit on a plan stipulated in the policy, effective as of the
due date, of an amount as may be hereinafter specified. In lieu of the
stipulated paid-up nonforfeiture benefit, the company may substitute, upon
proper request no later than sixty days after the due date of the premium in
default, an actuarially equivalent alternative paid-up nonforfeiture benefit
that provides a greater amount or longer period of death benefits or, if
applicable, a greater amount or earlier payment of endowment benefits.

(B) That, upon
surrender of the policy within sixty days after the due date of any premium
payment in default after premiums have been paid for at least three full years
in the case of ordinary insurance or five full years in the case of industrial
insurance, the company shall pay, in lieu of any paid-up nonforfeiture benefit,
a cash surrender value of an amount as may be hereinafter specified.

(C) That a
specified paid-up nonforfeiture benefit shall become effective as specified in
the policy unless the person entitled to make the election elects another
available option not later than sixty days after the due date of the premium in
default.

(D) That, if the
policy has been paid up by completion of all premium payments or if it is
continued under any paid-up nonforfeiture benefit that became effective on or
after the third policy anniversary in the case of ordinary insurance or the
fifth policy anniversary in the case of industrial insurance, the company shall
pay, upon surrender of the policy within thirty days after any policy
anniversary, a cash surrender value of an amount as may be hereinafter
specified.

(E) In the case of
policies that cause, on a basis guaranteed in the policy, unscheduled changes
in benefits or premiums, or that provide an option for changes in benefits or
premiums other than a change to a new policy, a statement of the mortality
table, interest rate, and method used in calculating cash surrender values and
the paid-up nonforfeiture benefits available under the policy. In the
case of all other policies, a statement of the mortality table and interest
rate used in calculating the cash surrender values and the paid-up
nonforfeiture benefits available under the policy, together with a table
showing the cash surrender value, if any, and paid-up nonforfeiture benefit, if
any, available under the policy on each policy anniversary either during the
first twenty policy years or during the term of the policy, whichever is
shorter, the values and benefits to be calculated upon the assumption that
there are no dividends or paid-up additions credited to the policy and that
there is no indebtedness to the company on the policy.

(F) A statement
that the cash surrender values and the paid-up nonforfeiture benefits available
under the policy are not less than the minimum values and benefits required by
or pursuant to the insurance law of the jurisdiction in which the policy is
delivered; an explanation of the manner in which the cash surrender values and
the paid-up nonforfeiture benefits are altered by the existence of any paid-up
additions credited to the policy or any indebtedness to the company on the
policy; if a detailed statement of the method of computation of the values and
benefits shown in the policy is not stated therein, a statement that the method
of computation has been filed with the insurance supervisory official of the
jurisdiction in which the policy is delivered; and a statement of the method to
be used in calculating the cash surrender value and a paid-up nonforfeiture
benefit available under the policy on any policy anniversary beyond the last anniversary
for which values and benefits are consecutively shown in the policy.

(2) Any of the provisions in paragraph (1) or
portions thereof not applicable by reason of the plan of insurance may, to the
extent inapplicable, be omitted from the policy.

(3) The company shall
reserve the right to defer the payment of any cash surrender value for a period
of six months after demand therefor with surrender of the policy.

(c) With regard to the computation of cash
surrender value:

(1) Any cash surrender value available under the
policy in the event of default in a premium payment due on any policy
anniversary, regardless of subsection (b), shall be an amount not less than the
excess, if any, of the present value, on the anniversary, of the future guaranteed
benefits that would have been provided for by the policy, including any
existing paid-up additions, if there had been no default, over the sum of:

(A) The then present value of the adjusted
premiums as defined in subsection (e) corresponding to premiums that would have
fallen due on and after the anniversary; and

(B) The amount of any indebtedness to the
company on the policy.

(2) For any policy issued on or after the operative
date of subsection (e)(8) that provides supplemental life insurance or annuity
benefits at the option of the insured and for an identifiable additional
premium by rider or supplemental policy provision, the cash surrender value
referred to in paragraph (1) shall be an amount not less than the sum of the
cash surrender value for an otherwise similar policy issued at the same age
without the rider or supplemental policy provision and the cash surrender value
as defined in paragraph (1) for a policy that provides only the benefits
otherwise provided by the rider or supplemental policy provision.

(3) For any family policy issued on or after the
operative date of subsection (e)(8) that defines a primary insured and provides
term insurance on the life of the spouse of the primary insured expiring before
the spouse's seventy-first birthday, the cash surrender value referred to in
paragraph (1) shall be an amount not less than the sum of the cash surrender
value for an otherwise similar policy issued at the same age without term
insurance on the life of the spouse and the cash surrender value as defined in
paragraph (1) for a policy that provides only the benefits otherwise provided
by term insurance on the life of the spouse.

(4) Any cash surrender value available within thirty
days after any policy anniversary under any policy paid up by completion of all
premium payments or any policy continued under any paid-up nonforfeiture
benefit, regardless of subsection (b), shall be an amount not less than the
present value, on the anniversary, of the future guaranteed benefits provided
for by the policy, including any existing paid-up additions, decreased by any
indebtedness to the company on the policy.

(d) With regard to the computation of paid-up
nonforfeiture benefits, for any paid-up nonforfeiture benefit available under
the policy in the event of default in a premium payment due on any policy
anniversary shall be such that its present value as of the anniversary shall be
at least equal to the cash surrender value then provided for by the policy or,
if none is provided for, that cash surrender value that would have been
required by this section in the absence of the condition that premiums shall
have been paid for at least a specified period.

(e) With regard to
the calculation of adjusted premiums:

(1) This section shall not apply to policies issued
on or after the operative date of paragraph (8). Except as provided in
paragraph (4), the adjusted premiums for any policy shall be calculated on an
annual basis and shall be a uniform percentage of the respective premiums
specified in the policy for each policy year, excluding amounts stated in the
policy as extra premiums to cover impairments or special hazards of the present
value at the date of issue of the policy, of all such adjusted premiums shall
be equal to the sum of:

(A) The then present value of the future
guaranteed benefits provided for by the policy;

(B) Two per cent of the amount of insurance,
if the insurance is uniform in amount, or of the equivalent uniform amount, as
hereinafter defined, if the amount of insurance varies with duration of the
policy;

(C) Forty per cent of the adjusted premium
for the first policy year; and

(D) Twenty-five per cent of either the
adjusted premium for the first policy year or the adjusted premium for a whole
life policy of the same uniform or equivalent uniform amount with uniform
premiums for the whole of life issued at the same age for the same amount of
insurance, whichever is less.

(2) In applying the percentages specified in
paragraph (1)(C) and (D), no adjusted premium shall be deemed to exceed four
per cent of the amount of insurance or level amount equivalent. The date of
issue of a policy for the purpose of this subsection shall be the date as of
which the rated age of the insured is determined.

(3) In the case of a policy
providing an amount of insurance varying with duration of the policy, the
equivalent level amount for the purpose of this subsection shall be deemed to
be the level amount of insurance provided by an otherwise similar policy,
containing the same endowment benefit or benefits, if any, issued at the same
age and for the same term, the amount of which does not vary with duration and
the benefits under which have the same present value at the inception of the
insurance as the benefits under the policy.

(4) The adjusted premiums
for any policy providing term insurance benefits by rider or supplemental policy
provision shall be equal to:

(A) The adjusted premiums for an otherwise
similar policy issued at the same age without the term insurance benefits,
increased, during the period for which premiums for the term insurance benefits
are payable, by

(B) The adjusted premiums for the term
insurance.

The foregoing amounts in subparagraphs (A) and
(B) being calculated separately and as specified in paragraphs (1) and (3),
except that, for the purposes of paragraph (1)(B), (C), and (D), the amount of
insurance or equivalent uniform amount of insurance used in the calculation of
the adjusted premiums referred to in paragraph (1)(B) shall be equal to the
excess of the corresponding amount determined for the entire policy over the
amount used in the calculation of the adjusted premiums in subparagraph (A).

(5) Except as otherwise provided in paragraphs (6)
and (7), all adjusted premiums and present values referred to in this section
shall for all policies of ordinary insurance be calculated on the basis of the
Commissioners 1941 Standard Ordinary Mortality Table; provided that for any
category of ordinary insurance issued on female risks, adjusted premiums and
present values may be calculated according to any age not more than three years
younger than the actual age of the insured and the calculations for all
policies of industrial insurance shall be made on the basis of the 1941
Standard Industrial Mortality Table. All calculations shall be made on the
basis of the rate of interest, not exceeding three and one-half per cent a
year, specified in the policy for calculating cash surrender values and paid-up
nonforfeiture benefits.

In calculating the present value of any
paid-up term insurance with accompanying pure endowment, if any, offered as a
nonforfeiture benefit, the rates of mortality assumed may be not more than one
hundred thirty per cent of the rates of mortality according to the applicable
table.

For insurance
issued on a substandard basis, the calculation of any adjusted premiums and
present values may be based on any other table of mortality as may be specified
by the company and approved by the commissioner.

(6) This paragraph shall not apply to ordinary policies
issued on or after the operative date of paragraph (8). In the case of
ordinary policies issued on or after the operative date of this paragraph, all
adjusted premiums and present values referred to in this section shall be
calculated on the basis of the Commissioners 1958 Standard Ordinary Mortality
Table and the rate of interest specified in the policy for calculating cash
surrender values and paid-up nonforfeiture benefits; provided that the rate of
interest shall not exceed three and one-half per cent a year, except that:

(A) A rate of interest not exceeding four per
cent a year may be used for policies issued after June 1, 1976, and prior
to June 1, 1979;

(B) A rate of interest not exceeding five and
one-half per cent a year may be used for policies issued on or after June 1,
1979; and

(C) For any single premium whole life or
endowment insurance policy, a rate of interest not exceeding six and one-half
per cent a year may be used.

For any category of ordinary insurance
issued on female risks, adjusted premiums and present values may be calculated
according to an age not more than six years younger than the actual age of the
insured.

In calculating the present value of any
paid-up term insurance with accompanying pure endowment, if any, offered as a
nonforfeiture benefit, the rates of mortality assumed may be not more than
those shown in the Commissioners 1958 Extended Term Insurance Table.

For insurance issued on a substandard basis,
the calculation of any adjusted premiums and present values may be based on
such other table of mortality as may be specified by the company and approved
by the commissioner.

After June 1, 1959, any company may file
with the commissioner a written notice of its election to comply with this
paragraph after a specified date before January 1, 1966. After the filing of
such notice, upon the specified date (which shall be the operative date of this
paragraph for that company), this paragraph shall become operative with respect
to the ordinary policies thereafter issued by the company. If a company makes
no such election, the operative date of this paragraph for the company shall be
January 1, 1966.

(7) This paragraph shall not apply to industrial
policies issued on or after the operative date of paragraph (8). In the
case of industrial policies issued on or after the operative date of this
paragraph, all adjusted premiums and present values referred to in this section
shall be calculated on the basis of the Commissioners 1961 Standard Industrial
Mortality Table and the rate of interest specified in the policy for
calculating cash surrender values and paid-up nonforfeiture benefits; provided
that the rate of interest shall not exceed three and one-half per cent a year,
except that:

(A) A rate of interest not exceeding four per
cent a year may be used for policies issued on or after June 1, 1976, and prior
to June 1, 1979;

(B) A rate of interest not exceeding five and
one-half per cent a year may be used for policies issued on or after June 1,
1979; and

(C) For any single premium whole life or
endowment insurance policy a rate of interest not exceeding six and one-half
per cent a year may be used.

In calculating the present value of any
paid-up term insurance with accompanying pure endowment, if any, offered as a
nonforfeiture benefit, the rates of mortality assumed may be not more than
those shown in the Commissioners 1961 Industrial Extended Term Insurance Table.

For insurance
issued on a substandard basis, the calculation of any adjusted premiums and
present values may be based on such other table of mortality as may be
specified by the company and approved by the commissioner.

After May 8,
1965, any company may file with the commissioner a written notice of its
election to comply with this paragraph after a specified date before January 1,
1968. After the filing of the notice, upon the specified date (which shall be
the operative date of this paragraph for that company), this paragraph shall
become operative with respect to the industrial policies thereafter issued by
the company. If a company makes no such election, the operative date of this
paragraph for the company shall be January 1, 1968.

(8) (A) This paragraph shall
apply to all policies issued on or after the operative date of this paragraph.
Except as provided in subparagraph (G), the adjusted premiums for any policy
shall be calculated on an annual basis and shall be a uniform percentage of the
respective premiums specified in the policy for each policy year, excluding
amounts payable as extra premiums to cover impairments or special hazards and
also excluding any uniform annual contract charge or policy fee specified in
the policy in a statement of the method to be used in calculating the cash
surrender values and paid-up nonforfeiture benefits, that the present value, at
the date of issue of the policy, of all adjusted premiums shall be equal to the
sum of:

(i) The then present value of the future
guaranteed benefits provided for by the policy;

(ii) One per cent of either the amount of
insurance, if the insurance be uniform in amount, or the average amount of
insurance at the beginning of each of the first ten policy years; and

(iii) One hundred twenty-five per cent of the
nonforfeiture net level premium as hereinafter defined.

In applying the percentage specified in
clause (iii), no nonforfeiture net level premium shall be deemed to exceed four
per cent of either the amount of insurance, if the insurance be uniform in
amount, or the average amount of insurance at the beginning of each of the
first ten policy years. The date of issue of a policy for the purpose of this
paragraph shall be the date as of which the rated age of the insured is
determined.

(B) The nonforfeiture net level premium shall
be equal to the present value, at the date of issue of the policy, of the
guaranteed benefits provided for by the policy divided by the present value, at
the date of issue of the policy, of an annuity of one per annum payable on the
date of issue of the policy and on each anniversary of the policy on which a
premium falls due.

(C) In the case of policies that cause, on a
basis guaranteed in the policy, unscheduled changes in benefits or premiums, or
that provide an option for changes in benefits or premiums, other than a change
to a new policy, the adjusted premiums and present values shall initially be
calculated on the assumption that future benefits and premiums do not change
from those stipulated at the date of issue of the policy. At the time of any
such change in the benefit or premiums, the future adjusted premiums,
nonforfeiture net level premiums, and present values shall be recalculated on
the assumption that future benefits and premiums do not change from those
stipulated by the policy immediately after the change.

(D) Except as otherwise provided in
subparagraph (G), the recalculated future adjusted premiums for any policy
shall be the uniform percentage of the respective future premiums specified in
the policy for each policy year, excluding amounts payable as extra premiums to
cover impairments and special hazards, and also excluding any uniform annual
contract charge or policy fee specified in the policy in a statement of the
method to be used in calculating the cash surrender values and paid-up
nonforfeiture benefits, that the present value, at the time of change to the
newly defined benefits or premiums, of all the future adjusted premiums shall
be equal to the excess of the sum of:

(i) The then present value of the then future
guaranteed benefits provided for by the policy; and

(ii) The additional expense allowance, if any,
over the then cash surrender value, if any, or present value of any paid-up
nonforfeiture benefit under the policy.

(E) The additional expense allowance, at the
time of the change to the newly defined benefits or premiums, shall be the sum
of:

(i) One per cent of
the excess, if positive, of the average amount of insurance at the beginning of
each of the first ten policy years subsequent to the change over the average
amount of insurance prior to the change at the beginning of each of the first
ten policy years subsequent to the time of the most recent previous change, or,
if there has been no previous change, the date of issue of the policy; and

(ii) One hundred
twenty-five per cent of the increase, if positive, in the nonforfeiture net
level premium.

(F) The recalculated nonforfeiture net level
premium shall be equal to the result obtained by dividing the value defined in
clause (i) by the value defined in clause (ii):

(i) The nonforfeiture net level premium
applicable prior to the charge times the present value of an annuity of one per
annum payable on each anniversary of the policy on or subsequent to the date of
the charges on which a premium would have fallen due had the change not
occurred, plus the present value of the increase in future guaranteed benefits
provided for by the policy; and

(ii) The present value of an annuity of one per
annum payable on each anniversary of the policy on or subsequent to the date of
charge on which a premium falls due.

(G) Notwithstanding any other provision of
this paragraph to the contrary, in the case of a policy issued on a substandard
basis that provides reduced graded amounts of insurance so that, in each policy
year, such policy has the same tabular mortality cost as an otherwise similar
policy issued on the standard basis that provides higher uniform amounts of
insurance, adjusted premiums and present values for the substandard policy may
be calculated as if it were issued to provide such higher uniform amounts of
insurance on the standard basis.

(H) All adjusted premiums and present values
referred to in this section shall: for all policies of ordinary insurance be
calculated on the basis of either the Commissioners 1980 Standard Ordinary
Mortality Table or, at the election of the company for any one or more
specified plans of life insurance, the Commissioners 1980 Standard Ordinary
Mortality Table with Ten-Year Select Mortality Factors; for all policies of
industrial insurance be calculated on the basis of the Commissioners 1961
Standard Industrial Mortality Table; and for all policies issued in a
particular calendar year be calculated on the basis of a rate of interest not
exceeding the nonforfeiture interest rate as defined in this paragraph for
policies issued in that calendar year; provided that:

(i) At the option of the company, calculations
for all policies issued in a particular calendar year may be made on the basis
of a rate of interest not exceeding nonforfeiture interest rate, as defined in
this paragraph, for policies issued in the immediately preceding calendar year;

(ii) Under any paid-up nonforfeiture benefit,
including any paid-up dividend additions, any cash surrender value available,
regardless of subsection (b), shall be calculated on the basis of the mortality
table and rate of interest used in determining the amount of such paid-up
nonforfeiture benefit and paid-up dividend additions, if any;

(iii) A company may calculate the amount of any
guaranteed paid-up nonforfeiture benefit, including any paid-up additions under
the policy on the basis of an interest rate no lower than that specified in the
policy for calculating cash surrender values;

(iv) In calculating the present value of any
paid-up term insurance with accompanying pure endowment, if any, offered as a
nonforfeiture benefit, the rates of mortality assumed may be not more than
those shown in the Commissioners 1980 Extended Term Insurance Table for
policies of ordinary insurance and not more than the Commissioners 1961
Industrial Extended Term Insurance Table for policies of industrial insurance;

(v) For insurance issued on a substandard
basis, the calculation of any adjusted premiums and present values may be based
on appropriate modifications of the aforementioned tables;

(vi) For policies issued prior to the operative
date of the valuation manual, any commissioners standard ordinary mortality
tables, adopted after 1980 by the National Association of Insurance
Commissioners, that are approved by rule by the commissioner for use in
determining the minimum nonforfeiture standard may be substituted for the
Commissioners 1980 Standard Ordinary Mortality Table with or without Ten-Year
Select Mortality Factors or for the Commissioners 1980 Extended Term Insurance
Table.

For policies issued on or after the
operative date of the valuation manual, the valuation manual shall provide the
commissioners standard mortality table for use in determining the minimum
nonforfeiture standard that may be substituted for the Commissioners 1980
Standard Ordinary Mortality Table with or without Ten-Year Select Mortality
Factors or for the Commissioners 1980 Extended Term Insurance Table. If the
commissioner approves by rule any commissioners standard ordinary mortality
table adopted by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners for use in
determining the minimum nonforfeiture standard for policies issued on or after
the operative date of the valuation manual, then that minimum nonforfeiture
standard supersedes the minimum nonforfeiture standard provided by the
valuation manual; and

(vii) For policies issued prior to the operative
date of the valuation manual, any commissioners standard industrial mortality
tables, adopted after 1980 by the National Association of Insurance
Commissioners, that are approved by rule by the commissioner for use in
determining the minimum nonforfeiture standard may be substituted for the
Commissioners 1961 Standard Industrial Mortality Table or the Commissioners
1961 Industrial Extended Term Insurance Table.

For
policies issued on or after the operative date of the valuation manual, the
valuation manual shall provide the commissioners standard mortality table for
use in determining the minimum nonforfeiture standard that may be substituted
for the Commissioners 1961 Standard Industrial Mortality Table or the
Commissioners 1961 Industrial Extended Term Insurance Table. If the
commissioner approves by rule any commissioners standard industrial mortality
table adopted by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners for use in
determining the minimum nonforfeiture standard for policies issued on or after
the operative date of the valuation manual, then that minimum nonforfeiture
standard supersedes the minimum nonforfeiture standard provided by the
valuation manual.

(I) As used in this paragraph,
"nonforfeiture interest rate" means:

(i) For policies issued prior to the operative
date of the valuation manual, the nonforfeiture interest rate per annum for any
policy issued in a particular calendar year shall be equal to one hundred
twenty-five per cent of the calendar year statutory valuation interest rate for
such policy as defined in the Standard Valuation Law, rounded to the nearer one
quarter of one per cent; provided that the nonforfeiture interest rate shall
not be less than four per cent; and

(ii) For policies issued on or after the
operative date of the valuation manual, the nonforfeiture interest rate per
annum for any policy issued in a particular calendar year shall be as provided
by the valuation manual.

(J) Notwithstanding any other provision in
this chapter to the contrary, any refiling of nonforfeiture values or their
methods of computation for any previously approved policy form that involves
only a change in the interest rate or mortality table used to compute
nonforfeiture values shall not require refiling of any other provisions of that
policy form.

(K) After the
effective date of this paragraph, any company may file with the commissioner a
written notice of its election to comply with this paragraph after a specified
date before January 1, 1989, which shall be the operative date of this
paragraph for the company. If a company makes no election, the operative date
of this paragraph for the company shall be January 1, 1989.

(L) In the case of
any plan of life insurance that provides for future premium determination, the
amounts of which are to be determined by the insurance company based on
estimates of future experience, or in the case of any plan of life insurance
that is of such a nature that minimum values cannot be determined by the
methods described in this subsection and subsections (b) to (d), then:

(i) The commissioner shall be satisfied that
the benefits provided under the plan are substantially as favorable to
policyholders and insureds as the minimum benefits otherwise required by
subsections (b) to (d) and this subsection;

(ii) The commissioner shall be satisfied that
the benefits and the pattern of premiums of that plan are not such as to
mislead prospective policyholders or insureds; and

(iii) The cash surrender values and paid-up
nonforfeiture benefits provided by the plan shall not be less than the minimum
values and benefits required for the plan computed by a method consistent with
the principles of this Standard Nonforfeiture Law for Life Insurance, as
determined by rules adopted by the commissioner.

(f) Any cash surrender value and any paid-up
nonforfeiture benefit, available under the policy in the event of default in a
premium payment due at any time other than on the policy anniversary, shall be
calculated with allowance for the lapse of time and the payment of fractional
premiums beyond the last preceding policy anniversary. All values referred to
in subsections (c), (d), and (e) may be calculated upon the assumption that any
death benefit is payable at the end of the policy year of death. The net value
of any paid-up additions, other than paid-up term additions, shall be not less
than the amounts used to provide such additions. Notwithstanding subsection
(c) to the contrary, additional benefits payable:

(1) In the event of death or dismemberment by
accident or accidental means;

(2) In the event of total and permanent disability;

(3) As reversionary annuity or deferred reversionary
annuity benefits;

(4) As term insurance benefits provided by a rider or
supplemental policy provision to which, if issued as a separate policy, this
section would not apply;

(5) As term insurance on the life of a child or on
the lives of children provided in a policy on the life of a parent of the
child, if the term insurance expires before the child's age is twenty-six, is
uniform in amount after the child's age is one, and has not become paid up by
reason of the death of a parent of the child; and

(6) As other policy benefits additional to life
insurance and endowment benefits, and premiums for all such additional
benefits,

shall be disregarded in ascertaining cash surrender
values and nonforfeiture benefits required by this section, and no such
additional benefits shall be required to be included in any paid-up
nonforfeiture benefits.

(g) This subsection, in addition to all other
applicable subsections, shall apply to all policies issued on or after January
1, 1985. Any cash surrender value available under the policy in the event of
default in a premium payment due on any policy anniversary shall be in an
amount that does not differ by more than two-tenths of one per cent of either
the amount of insurance, if the insurance be uniform in amount, or the average
amount of insurance at the beginning of each of the first ten policy years,
from the sum of the greater of zero and the basic cash value hereinafter
specified, and the present value of any existing paid-up additions less the
amount of any indebtedness to the company under the policy.

The basic cash value
shall be equal to the present value, on the anniversary, of the future
guaranteed benefits that would have been provided for by the policy, excluding
any existing paid-up additions and before deduction of any indebtedness to the
company, if there had been no default, less the then present value of the
nonforfeiture factors, as hereinafter defined, corresponding to premiums that
would have fallen due on and after the anniversary. The effects on the
basic cash value of supplemental life insurance or annuity benefits or of
family coverage, as described in subsection (c) or (e)(1), (2), (3), (4), and
(5), whichever is applicable, shall be the same as are the effects specified in
subsection (c) or (e)(1), (2), (3), (4), and (5), whichever is applicable, on
the cash surrender values defined in that subsection.

The nonforfeiture
factor for each policy year shall be an amount equal to a percentage of the
adjusted premium for the policy year, as defined in subsection (e)(1), (2),
(3), (4), and (5) or subsection (e)(8), whichever is applicable. Except
as is required by the next succeeding sentence of this paragraph, the
percentage:

(1) Shall be the same for each policy year between the
second policy anniversary and the later of:

(A) The fifth policy anniversary; and

(B) The first policy anniversary at which
there is available under the policy a cash surrender value in an amount, before
including any paid-up additions and before deducting any indebtedness, of at
least two-tenths of one per cent of either the amount of insurance, if the
insurance be uniform in amount, or the average amount of insurance at the
beginning of each of the first ten policy years; and

(2) Shall be such that no
percentage after the later of the two policy anniversaries specified in
paragraph (1) may apply to fewer than five consecutive policy years.

No basic cash value may be less than the value that
would be obtained if the adjusted premiums for the policy, as defined in
subsection (e)(8), were substituted for the nonforfeiture factors in the
calculation of the basic cash value.

All adjusted premiums
and present values referred to in this subsection shall for a particular policy
be calculated on the same mortality and interest bases as are used in
demonstrating the policy's compliance with this section. The cash surrender
values referred to in this subsection shall include any endowment benefits
provided for by the policy.

Any cash surrender
value available other than in the event of default in a premium payment due on
a policy anniversary, and the amount of any paid-up nonforfeiture benefit
available under the policy in the event of default in a premium payment shall
be determined in manners consistent with the manners specified for determining
the analogous minimum amounts in subsections (b), (c), (d), (e)(8), and (f).
The amounts of any cash surrender values and of any paid-up nonforfeiture
benefits granted in connection with additional benefits such as those listed in
subsection (f)(1) to (6) shall conform with the principles of this subsection.

(h) This section
shall not apply to any of the following:

(1) Reinsurance;

(2) Group insurance;

(3) Pure endowment;

(4) Annuity or reversionary annuity contract;

(5) Term policy uniform amount, which provides no
guaranteed nonforfeiture or endowment benefits, or renewal thereof, of twenty
years or less expiring before age seventy-one, for which uniform premiums are
payable during the entire term of the policy;

(6) Term policy of decreasing amount, which provides
no guaranteed nonforfeiture or endowment benefits, on which each adjusted
premium, calculated as specified in subsection (e), is less than the adjusted
premium so calculated, on a term policy of uniform amount, or renewal thereof,
which provides no guaranteed nonforfeiture or endowment benefits, issued at the
same age and for the same initial amount of insurance and for a term of twenty
years or less expiring before age seventy-one, for which uniform premiums are
payable during the entire term of the policy;

(7) Policy, which provides no guaranteed
nonforfeiture or endowment benefits, for which no cash surrender value, if any,
or present value of any paid-up nonforfeiture benefit, at the beginning of any
policy year calculated as specified in subsections (c), (d), and (e), exceeds
two and one-half per cent of the amount of insurance at the beginning of the
policy year; and

(8) Policy that shall be delivered outside this State
through a producer or other representative of the company issuing the policy.

For purposes of determining the applicability
of this section, the age at expiry for a joint term life insurance policy shall
be the age at expiry of the oldest life.

(i) After January 1, 1956, any company may
file with the commissioner a written notice of its election to comply with this
section after a specified date within six months from January 1, 1956. After
the filing of the notice, then upon the specified date (which shall be the
operative date for the company), this section shall become operative with
respect to the policies thereafter issued by the company. If a company makes
no election, the operative date of this section for the company shall be six
months from January 1, 1956.

(j) As used in this section, "operative
date of the valuation manual" means the January 1 of the first calendar
year that the valuation manual, as defined in section 431:5-307(t), is
effective. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L 2003, c 212, §86; am L 2004, c 122,
§45; am L 2014, c 234, §5]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next